Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF4741.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin [299A.965] DOMESTIC VIOLENCE OFFENDER REGISTRY. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Definitions. new text end new text begin For purposes of this section: new text end new text begin (1) "domestic violence offender" means a person convicted of a qualified domestic violence-related offense after having been previously convicted of a qualified domestic violence-related offense; new text end new text begin (2) "family or household member" has the meaning given in section 518B.01, subdivision 2; and new text end new text begin (3) "qualified domestic violence-related offense" has the meaning given in section 609.02, subdivision 16, but applies only to offenses committed by the offender against a family or household member of the offender. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Registry; publication of information on the Internet. new text end new text begin (a) The commissioner of public safety must maintain a registry related to domestic violence offenders. The registry must contain the offender's name; address; date of birth; date, county, and crime of conviction; recent photograph; and, if reasonably available, a copy of the offender's driver's license or other government-issued identification. Registry information must be made available upon request to peace officers investigating a crime. new text end new text begin (b) The commissioner must maintain a public website in a searchable format and publish on the site the offender's name, date of birth, date and county of conviction, and photograph. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Duties of the court and others. new text end new text begin (a) Upon the conviction of a person for a registrable offense, the court must inform the person of the person's duty to register under this section and forward to the commissioner of public safety the person's name; address; date of birth; date, county, and crime of conviction; recent photograph; and, if reasonably available, a copy of the person's driver's license or other government-issued identification. new text end new text begin (b) If a person required to register is assigned a probation officer or is incarcerated for the offense, the officer or corrections official with oversight over the person must determine whether the items described in paragraph (a) have been forwarded to the commissioner and, if not, forward the items. new text end new text begin (c) Failure of the court, probation officer, or corrections official to perform a duty under this subdivision does not excuse the person from registering and providing the required information to the commissioner. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Registration period. new text end new text begin The commissioner of public safety must maintain a person's registration and continue to publish the information described in subdivision 2 for: new text end new text begin (1) five years from the date of the triggering conviction, if the person has one previous qualified domestic violence-related offense conviction; new text end new text begin (2) seven years from the date of the triggering conviction, if the person has two previous qualified domestic violence-related offense convictions; new text end new text begin (3) ten years from the date of the triggering conviction, if the person has three previous qualified domestic violence-related offense convictions; and new text end new text begin (4) 20 years from the date of the triggering conviction, if the person has four or more previous qualified domestic violence-related offense convictions. new text end new text begin Subd. 5. new text end new text begin Cooperation required. new text end new text begin A person required to register under this section must cooperate with the commissioner of public safety, court, probation officer, and corrections official to provide the information required for the registry and must provide an updated address when the person changes the person's primary residence and updated photographs and other information as required by the commissioner. new text end new text begin Subd. 6. new text end new text begin Criminal penalty. new text end new text begin A person required to register under this section who was given notice, knows, or reasonably should know of the duty to register and who (1) knowingly commits an act or fails to fulfill a requirement in violation of a provision of this section, or (2) intentionally provides false information, is guilty of a misdemeanor. new text end new text begin Subd. 7. new text end new text begin Registration fee. new text end new text begin (a) Upon a person's conviction for a registrable offense, in addition to any other punishment, fee, or assessment required under law, the court must impose a $150 registration fee on the person. $50 of this fee must be deposited in the general fund and the remainder must be deposited into the Minnesota victims of crime account under section 299A.708. new text end new text begin (b) The court must waive payment of the fee required under this subdivision on a showing of indigency and may waive or reduce payment of the assessment on a showing of undue hardship upon the convicted person or the convicted person's immediate family. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective August 1, 2026, and applies to crimes committed on or after that date. new text end Sec. 2. new text begin APPROPRIATION.new text end new text begin $....... in fiscal year 2027 is appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of public safety to establish and maintain the registry under section 299A.965. new text end